bagval_numbers.twol
Alphabet 
	а б в г д е и й л р с у х ч щ ъ ь т н I А Б В Г Д Е И Й Л Р С У Х Ч Щ Ъ Ь Т Н
	%{у%}:у %{у%}:в %{у%}:0
	%{и%}:и %{и%}:0
	%{е%}:е %{е%}:0
	%{а%}:а %{а%}:0
	%{т%}:т %{т%}:0
	%{в%}:в %{в%}:0
;

Sets
ends = р д ;
suffixes = б а ;
C = ч щ в д к р л с г х Ӏ б т л н т ;
V = а е и у А Е И У ъ Ъ ;

Rules
"e realisation"
%{е%}:0 <=> _ suffixes ;

"i realisation_2"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ suffixes ;

!"д realisation"
!%{д%}:д <=> в _ V ;

!"д realisation2"
!%{д%}:0 <=> _ C ;

"u in bu'uda & haquda"
%{у%}:у <=> _ ends ;

"u in bu'besenda"
%{у%}:0 <=> V _ suffixes ;

"u in haqvbesenda"
%{у%}:в <=> C _ suffixes ;

"а realisation"
%{а%}:0 <=> _ V ;

"v realisation"
%{в%}:0 <=> _ C ;

"t realisation"
%{т%}:0 <=> _ C ;
